Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2076.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-5-20.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-5 entitled "Councils
and Governing Bodies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-5-20.1. Power of city and town councils and regional school districts to jointly
establish an insurance corporation, to obtain insurance, and to enter into a cooperative risk
management program.
(a) Cities and town councils, school committees, water and fire districts may, through
passage of a resolution, establish agreements between two (2) or more cities, town councils, school
committees, and water and fire districts for obtaining for obtaining or effecting insurance by self
insurance, for obtaining or effecting insurance from any insurer authorized to transact insurance in
the state, or for obtaining and effecting insurance secured in accordance with any other method
provided by law, or by combination and of the provisions of this section for obtaining and effecting
insurance. Agreements made pursuant to this section may provide for pooling of self insurance
reserves, risks, claims and losses, and of administrative expenses associated with the same, among
local government units.
(b) For purposes of this section the term “Eligible Entities” shall mean any city, town,
school committee, water or fire district, or other public or quasi-municipal authority, agency or
entity, or organization that is an instrumentality of such cities or towns, or any group of such cities
or towns, authorities, agencies or entities which is a member of the corporations created pursuant
to the provisions of this section.

(c) To accomplish the purposes of this section any two (2) or more cities, towns, school
committees, or water and fire districts, may authorize the creation of separate corporations (the
“corporation”) for the purpose of: (1) issuing to the eligible entities policies of insurance and
reinsurance of all types and categories, including, without being limited to, the following types and
categories: property, casualty, and life, accident, and health insurance, and (2) developing and
administering an interlocal risk management program. The corporations, in addition, may have as
their purposes reducing the risk of its members; safety engineering; distributing, sharing, and
pooling risks; acquiring excess loss insurance; and processing and defending claims against the
members of the corporations. Any contributions made to the corporations for the purpose of
distributing, sharing, or pooling risks shall be made on actuarially sound basis, and the corporations
shall have an audit performed annually, copies of which shall be provided to the members of the
corporations, and the auditor general; discrete accounts shall be kept for each risk management
program developed and administered by the corporations.
(d) The corporations shall not be considered an insurance company and but shall not be
subject to the provisions of the laws of the state of Rhode Island regulating insurance companies
and therefore shall in no way be regulated by the Rhode Island department of business regulation.
(e) The corporations created pursuant to the provisions of this section will be created by
filing articles of incorporation pursuant to chapter 6 of title 7 entitled Rhode Island Nonprofit
Corporation Act and the articles of incorporation will be filed by an incorporator/incorporators
designated by the city, town councils, school committees, or water or fire districts, authorizing the
creation of the corporation. The articles of incorporation creating the corporations pursuant to the
provisions of this section may contain provisions, not inconsistent with this section, that the
incorporators determine to be desirable or useful in fulfilling the purposes set forth in this section.
The corporations created pursuant to the provisions of this section will have the powers of a
nonprofit corporation created under chapter 6 of title 7 entitled Rhode Island Nonprofit Corporation
Act including, without being limited to, the power to issue bonds, notes, and other obligations in
any amounts and upon any terms that the corporation’s governing board determines.
(f) The corporations created pursuant to the provisions of this section, notwithstanding the
filing of its articles of incorporation pursuant to chapter 6 of title 7 entitled Rhode Island Nonprofit
Corporation Act, (1) will be deemed to be public corporations, instrumentality, and agency of the
state of Rhode Island acting for the benefit of the municipalities which are members of the
corporations and its eligible entities but will not constitute a department of the government of the
state of Rhode Island, and (2) will be deemed to be exercising public and essential governmental
functions of the state of Rhode Island. No part of the net earnings of the corporations created
LC003917 - Page 2 of 5

pursuant to the provisions of this section will be distributable to, or inure to the benefit of, any
private person. The members of the governing board of the corporations created pursuant to the
provisions of this section will consist solely of chief executives, chief elected officials, finance
directors, or treasurers of municipalities, or any other municipal officials that may be provided for
in the bylaws of the corporations, and the members shall receive no compensation for the
performance of their duties but each member may be reimbursed for his or her reasonable expenses
incurred in carrying out their duties.
(g) The bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the corporations created pursuant to
the provisions of this section will not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability or obligation of the
state of Rhode Island or of any political subdivision of the state or of any municipality which is a
member of the corporation but will be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the
corporations.
(h) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or special or general law to the contrary,
each eligible entity which is a member of the corporations created pursuant to the provisions of this
section will be authorized to enter into contracts with the corporations with respect to, among other
matters, the payment of premiums and other payments, for terms not exceeding twenty-five (25)
years in duration. To the extent that the obligation to pay premiums or make other payments under
any contract is deemed to constitute the incurring of indebtedness by an eligible entity the contract
may nevertheless be entered into without obtaining the approval of the electors of the city or town
notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 45-12-19 and 45-12-20 and notwithstanding any provisions
of the city’s or town’s charter or any special or general law to the contrary. Any contract may be
entered into by an eligible entity either prior to or subsequent to the making of any appropriations
which may be needed to carry out the obligations of the eligible entity under the contract.
(i) The property and assets of the corporations created pursuant to the provisions of this
section, the income of the corporations, and any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the
corporation, their transfer, and the income from these (including any profits made on the sale
thereof) will at all times be free from taxation by the state of Rhode Island or any political
subdivision or other instrumentality of the state of Rhode Island, excepting inheritance, estate, and
gift taxes with respect to the bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the corporations.
(j) Whenever the governing board of the corporations created pursuant to the provisions of
this section determines that the purposes for which the corporations were created have been
substantially fulfilled and all bonds, notes, or other obligations of the corporations have been fully
paid or adequate provision has been made for their payment, the corporations may be dissolved in
the manner provided for nonprofit corporations pursuant to chapter 6 of title 7 entitled Rhode Island
LC003917 - Page 3 of 5

Nonprofit Corporation Act and, upon the corporations’ dissolution, title to all funds and assets of
the corporation shall vest in and become the property of the members of the corporation in
proportions that are provided for in the corporation’s articles of incorporation.
(k) No corporations created pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be required to
pay any recording or filing fee or any transfer tax of any kind on account of papers or instruments
recorded or filed by it or on its behalf.
(l) No corporations created pursuant to the provisions of this section and no agent or broker
acting on behalf of the corporations shall be required to pay a surplus line premium tax of any kind
on premiums for any policies of insurance and reinsurance to or from the corporations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003917
========
LC003917 - Page 4 of 5